Massachusetts, session 194th, H387.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the town of Maynard may grant an additional license for the sale of all
alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to
Maynard Corner Store LLC d/b/a Maynard Corner Store located at 49 Walnut street in the town
of Maynard. The license shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 17.
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of the license granted under this
section
to any other location but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same location if
the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter
from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good standing
with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been paid.
of 2

(c) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this section or any
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of
the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority, and the
licensing authority may then grant the license to a new applicant at the same location under the
same conditions as specified in this section.
(d) The license authorized to be granted under this section shall be issued within 1 year
after the effective date of this act; provided, however, that if the license is originally granted
within that time period it may be granted to a new applicant under subsection (b) or (c)
thereafter.
SECTION 2. Upon the issuance of the license authorized pursuant to section 1, the
licensee shall return physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining
thereto, to the licensing authority, its license for the sale of wine and malt beverages not to be
drunk on the premises under section 15 of chapter 138 of the General Laws.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2